New York, session 2025-2026, A6114.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 366 of the social 2 services law, as amended by section 25 of part C of chapter 109 of the 3 laws of 2006, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) In determining the initial or continuing eligibility of any person 5 for assistance under this title, there shall be included in the amount 6 of resources considered available to such person the uncompensated value 7 of any resource transferred prior to the date of application for medical 8 assistance as specified in paragraphs (b), (c), (d) and (e) of this 9 subdivision, and such person shall be ineligible for such assistance for 10 such period or periods as specified in this subdivision. For the 11 purposes of determining medical assistance eligibility, the date of 12 transfer, shall be deemed as the date in which the certificate of real 13 property transfer is filed with the clerk in the county where such 14 transaction has occurred. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08657-01-5